




About Us | Spinnaker Trust















 












  About Us  Services   Investment Planning   Investment Management   Tax and Estate Planning   Tax Preparation   Trustee Services   ESOP Trustee Services    Publications  Portals   New Client Logon (Available starting July 3, 2017)   Old Client Logon (Available through July 31, 2017)   File Share Logon    Contact Us    
















						About Us
					


The Crew


Board of Directors





About Spinnaker Trust
Our History
Spinnaker Trust is a Maine bank chartered as a non-depository trust company. The firm was founded by Richard E. Curran, Jr. in December of 2000 as Spinnaker Advisors and began managing assets as Spinnaker Trust in April 2001. Spinnaker began operations on Milk Street in Portland’s Old Port District and received its bank charter in August of 2001.
At the end of 2001, Spinnaker rolled out its first fund of hedge funds, Spinnaker Diversified Managers Fund. This fund gave clients access to a diversified allocation of hedge fund managers, selected and overseen by Spinnaker professionals.
By 2003, Spinnaker managed over $100,000,000 and, by the end of 2004, twice that.
In 2007, Spinnaker launched its first private equity fund exposing its clients to another asset class. Spinnaker Trust also adopted an Employee Stock Ownership Plan (“ESOP”), allowing employees to become owners.
In 2009, Spinnaker launched its first commercial real estate fund to clients.
In 2010, Spinnaker was managing over $500,000,000 and had 14 employees.
2011 brought a need for more space and a move to 123 Free Street in the Arts District of Portland.
In 2012, Spinnaker Trust merged with Ram Trust Services, another Portland trust company, founded in the 1970s. Ram had a long history of serving wealthy families around the country and brought tax, private equity, and real estate expertise to the combined firm. Spinnaker Trust assets under management grew to over $1 billion.
Also in 2012, Spinnaker launched its Fossil Fuel Free Portfolio, which allows investors to divest their portfolios from fossil fuel investments
In 2015, Spinnaker named Amanda Rand, Bob Gould, Sara Lewis and Jessamyn Norton as Principals of the firm, joining founder Dick Curran as owner-managers.  Spinnaker also adopted a long-term ownership succession model, ensuring that Spinnaker will be able to attract the most able talent and remain predominately owner-managed for many years.
Today, Spinnaker Trust manages over $1.2 billion for over 300 separate clients.



Meet the Crew:

Director of Account Administration
Caitlin F.  DiMillo, Esq. 


View All









				 
			



The Crew
View All



Investment Management
Tax Services
Corporate Administration
Account Operations
Client Advisors
Account Administration








CLOSE
Senior Account Operations Administrator 
Tyler Blackburn
Email




 

(207) 541-9786

University of Maine, BS




Tyler joined Spinnaker in 2012 and has over 10 years of experience in trust operations and banking. Before joining Spinnaker, Tyler worked at Ram Trust Services serving in various roles in the operations department. Prior to that, he worked at Citigroup in the global corporate banking area.
A native of Portland, Tyler now lives there with his wife, Dominique, and their two children.







CLOSE
Account Operations Administrator 
Efe A. Brown
Email




 

(207) 541-9649

Andover College, AS
State of Maine Notary PublicState of Maine Dedimus Justice




Efe has almost 29 years of trust operations, trading and investment experience, having served as Assistant Manager of Trust Operations at Casco Northern Bank, Investment Services Coordinator at Key Trust Company and Trust Operations Assistant at Acadia Trust, N.A. before joining Spinnaker in 2001. A graduate of Andover College, Efe also studied banking and finance at Foundation University in the Philippines and has completed courses at the American Institute of Banking.
A native of the Philippines, Efe moved to Maine in 1983 and became a naturalized citizen in 1991. She lives in Westbrook.







CLOSE
Director of Operations 
Ainsley A. Coll, CTFA
Email




 

(207) 541-9781

Thomas College, BS; University of Southern Maine, MBA
State of Maine Notary Public
Certified Trust and Financial Advisor




Ainsley serves as Director of Operations at Spinnaker Trust and works with clients on all facets of trust, custody and IRA administration. Ainsley joined Ram Trust Services in 2007 and continues to serve both old and new clients in her role at Spinnaker. Previously, Ainsley worked as an accountant and in human resources at a local mortgage company.
A native of Rockland, Ainsley now lives in Casco with her daughter.







CLOSE
Tax Administrator 
Brenda Cook
Email




 

(207) 619-7890

			 		Notary Public
			 	



Brenda joined the tax department at Spinnaker in 2012.  Prior to that, she was employed in the legal field for 29 years, most recently at Jensen Baird Gardner & Henry, working on tax and estate planning. Her other areas of support have included corporate law and private foundations.
Brenda and her husband live in Scarborough with their three children.







CLOSE
President, Principal 
Richard E. Curran, Jr., Esq.
Email




 

(207) 553-7161

Dartmouth College, AB, MBAHarvard Law School, JDBoston University, LLM
Spinnaker Trust, Director




Dick is the Founder and President of Spinnaker Trust. He began his professional career at the law firm of Pierce Atwood LLP in 1977. His legal practice focused on estate and trust planning and administration, taxation and representation of closely held businesses. Dick left Pierce Atwood in 1991 to co-found Acadia Trust, N.A., a national bank devoted exclusively to trust and investment management services. Dick resigned from Acadia in 2000 to found Spinnaker Trust. He works closely with many families and their other professional advisors to address their interrelated estate and tax planning and investment issues. He has worked extensively with various types of sophisticated trust and retirement planning vehicles including charitable gift planning, the administration of 401(k) plans and ESOPs, and generation-skipping, life insurance, special needs and grantor retained annuity trusts.
Dick and his family live in Falmouth.







CLOSE
Director of Account Administration 
Caitlin F.  DiMillo, Esq.
Email




 

(207) 541-9651

University of Vermont, BA;
University of Maine School of Law, JD, cum laude
 
Maine Estate Planning Council
Maine State Bar Association, Trusts & Estates Section




Caitlin serves as Director of Account Administration at Spinnaker Trust.  As the leader of the account administration team, she oversees the administration of all client accounts and works closely with the relationship, portfolio, operations and tax managers to ensure that the firm’s clients receive the highest level of service. Caitlin is also directly responsible for handling the account administration for a number of Spinnaker’s larger and more complex relationships.
Prior to joining Spinnaker, Caitlin worked as a Trust & Estates lawyer at Hopkinson & Abbondanza, P.A., focusing her practice on high-level estate planning and trust and estate administration.
Caitlin lives in Falmouth with her husband, Steve, and daughter, Addy.







CLOSE
Account Administrator Assistant 
Diane C. Duplissis
Email




 



University of Maine
State of Maine Notary Public
Merrymeeting Commons Condominium Association, Board Member




Diane joined the Account Administration team in 2016. She came to Spinnaker after fourteen years in the legal field supporting the Estate and Wealth Preservation Planning practice of a local firm. She has served the accounting and claims departments in the insurance industry as well as managing the office, inventory management and supporting sales in the jewelry industry. Diane brings a world of enthusiasm to the team.
Diane is a proud native of the City of Lewiston. She currently lives in Topsham with her husband, John. Together they have five grown children and four wonderful grandchildren.  







CLOSE
Executive Vice President, Principal and Vice Chairman 
Robert R. Gould
Email




 



Yale College, BS
NYU Stern School of Business, MBA
Spinnaker Trust Director
New England Aquarium, Board of Overseers
Yale School of Management, Advisory Board
Squash Haven Inc., Board Member
Skillman Associates (the friends of Yale Squash), Board Member
The Hotchkiss School, Investment Committee
Prouts Neck Association, Past President
BPI Partners, Co-Manager




Robert R. Gould is an Executive Vice President, Principal and Vice Chairman at Spinnaker Trust.  At Spinnaker, Bob directly oversees the firm’s various alternative investment offerings, provides strategic leadership and works with a substantial number of Spinnaker Trust’s larger clients.
Bob was previously a General Partner of Brown Brothers Harriman & Co. from 1997 through 2010.  Bob joined BBH after graduating from Yale in 1981.  He was a banker and mergers and acquisitions advisor before co-founding and then leading the firm’s private equity business for ten years.  Bob then assumed responsibility for leadership of BBH’s overall Investment and Wealth Management business.  He was a member of the firm’s management and finance committees.
Bob is a Trustee and Chairman of the Investment Committee of The Pinkerton Foundation in New York and Vice Chairman of the Board of Directors of Magnetic Analysis Corp., a maker of non-destructive testing equipment for the metals industry. 
Bob lives in Hamilton, Massachusetts and Prouts Neck with his wife and three daughters.







CLOSE
Assistant Portfolio Manager 
Laura K. Greenstein
Email




 

(207) 619-7889

Bentley University, BS, cum laude
 
Portland Trails, Board Member
Chamber of Commerce, Ambassadors Council
Junior League of Portland, Member




Laura serves as an Assistant Portfolio Manager, working with relationship managers to develop and maintain appropriate risk-reward allocations based on clients' objectives.  Laura began her career in financial services at Unum.  Prior to joining Spinnaker, she was a financial advisor at Merrill Lynch. 
Laura is a native of Portland and currently lives on the east end.







CLOSE
Vice President, Tax Director 
Maria A. Gwinn, CPA
Email




 

(207) 541-9791

			 		University of Southern Maine, BSThomas College, MST
Certified Public AccountantAmerican Institute of Certified Public AccountantsMaine Society of CPAs
Maine Estate Planning Council




Maria serves as a Vice President of Spinnaker Trust and is the Director of the tax group. As Tax Director, Maria oversees the tax group's resources to ensure that clients' tax compliance, tax planning and strategic needs are met. Maria also works directly with various clients related to their individual, entity, trust and estate needs. Prior to joining Spinnaker Trust, the majority of her earlier career was spent at MacDonald Page Schatz Fletcher in South Portland.
Maria is a Maine native and resides in Scarborough.







CLOSE
Senior Account Administrator 
Karen P.  Hamblen
Email




 

(207) 541-9653

			 		Elmira College, BACannon Trust School
Maine Estate Planning Council




Karen utilizes her eight years of trust and account administration experience to provide client services for all of Spinnaker's wealth management clients, including those with trusts, estates and IRAs. Prior to the merger with Ram Trust Services, in addition to her account administration duties, Karen served as a tax assistant and helped prepare all types of tax returns for clients, including Forms 1099 and trust income tax returns. Karen came to Spinnaker from TD Wealth Management where she supported several trust officers in her position as Trust Administrator. Karen also has over eight years of trust operations experience. Having recently graduated from the Cannon Trust School, a three-year trust education program for professional trust service providers, Karen is working towards obtaining her Certified Trust and Financial Advisor certification.
Karen lives in Gorham with her husband, Jeremy, and two daughters, Madison and Emilee.







CLOSE
Manager of Alternative and Fixed Income Investment Strategies, Research Analyst 
Eben S. Jose, CFA
Email




 

(207) 541-9788

Boston College, BA
Chartered Financial Analyst
Maine CFA Society, Member
Friends School of Portland, Board Member
Lift360 Emerging Leaders Program, Graduate




Eben serves as Manager of Alternative and Fixed Income Investment Strategies as well as an Equity Research Analyst. He is responsible for managing all aspects of Spinnaker’s public and private alternative investments and also formulating the firm’s fixed income investment strategy. In addition, Eben evaluates new and existing equity investments for Spinnaker’s two stock portfolios. Prior to joining Spinnaker, Eben worked in Boston as a Senior Portfolio Risk Analyst at Santander Bank where he helped oversee the bank's commercial lending portfolio. Eben is a member of the Investment Committee and the Marketing Committee at Spinnaker.
A native of Boothbay, Maine, Eben lives in Portland with his wife and dog.







CLOSE
Full-Charge Bookkeeper 
Leigh Ann Larocque
Email




 

(207) 541-9785

University of Southern Maine, B.S.
State of Maine Notary Public




Leigh Ann recently joined us as full-charge bookkeeper processing accounts payable, accounts receivable and payroll.  She has 20 plus years working in finance and accounting.  Leigh Ann started her career as a staff accountant for The OneBancorp.  Then took time out from her career to stay home with her daughter and twin boys.  She returned to the work force as accounting clerk, and then moved on to become a bookkeeper and accounting supervisor for a start-up company.  The last twelve years, Leigh Ann has worked for a local manufacturing company as their accountant.
Leigh Ann lives in Raymond and has three grown children.  She loves boating, kayaking, skiing, reading and spending time with friends and family.







CLOSE
Portfolio Manager 
John F. Leonard
Email




 

(207) 541-9792

			 		University of Vermont, BS
			 	



As a Portfolio Manager with Spinnaker Trust, John is responsible for working with relationship managers to develop and maintain appropriate risk-reward allocations based on clients’ investment objectives and the trading of the global investment strategies.  John is also a member of the Investment Committee at Spinnaker Trust.
Prior to joining Spinnaker, John was with JP Morgan Securities, working closely with high net worth families and constructing fixed income portfolios for non-profit institutions. John began his career at Brown Brothers Harriman & Co. as a Securities Lending Analyst.
John resides in his native hometown of Woolwich, Maine.  







CLOSE
Senior Vice President, Director of Client Service, Principal 
Sara E. Lewis
Email




 

(207) 553-7165

Lehigh University, BS
Spurwink Services, Inc. Investment CommitteeFAME Maine Advisory Committee on College SavingsMaine Women’s Fund Investment Committee Spinnaker Trust Director




Sara has been with Spinnaker Trust since 2001. In her role as Senior Vice President, Director of Client Service, Sara ensures Spinnaker delivers an exceptional client experience including high-touch service and communication and state-of-the-art presentations and portfolio materials.   Sara is in charge of marketing efforts for the firm.  Sara is a Relationship Manager at Spinnaker and works directly with clients to help establish long-term goals and allocations, among other things. Prior to taking on the Client Service role, Sara oversaw the portfolio management and investment team.
Sara was with the Portland investment management firm of Head and Associates (now HeadInvest) before joining Spinnaker. Starting her career at Merrill Lynch, Sara worked for many years in New York City developing and marketing financial products and services for firms throughout the country.
A native of New Jersey and a Yankee fan, Sara has been in Maine for over 25 years and lives in South Portland with her wife and two rescue dogs.







CLOSE
Director of Portfolio Management and Trading 
Timothy E. Malisa
Email




 

(207) 553-7095

St. Lawrence University, BA
MaineShare, Director
Lift360 Emerging Leaders Program, Graduate




In his role as Director of Portfolio Management and Trading, Tim is responsible for managing the trading for all global investment strategies as well as working with relationship managers to develop and maintain appropriate risk-reward allocations based on clients' objectives. Tim is also a member of the Investment Committee at Spinnaker.
Prior to joining Spinnaker, Tim worked as a Trust Operations Associate at Eastern Wealth Management. Tim began his career at Standard Retirement Services, Inc. as a Trading Specialist.
A native of Syracuse, New York, Tim lives in Portland with his wife and dog.







CLOSE
Cash Administrator and Tamarac Administrator 
Kati Morrell
Email




 

(207) 541-9783

			 		Thomas College, BS
			 	



Kati serves as Cash Administrator and Tamarac Administrator at Spinnaker Trust and is responsible for processing all cash activity along with maintaining our Tamarac CRM database. Prior to joining Spinnaker Trust, Kati worked as a Strategic Portfolio Analyst at Wright Express, and as a Senior Accountant at Citigroup.
Kati lives in Windham with her son.







CLOSE
Chief Investment Officer, Senior Vice President, Principal 
Jessamyn Norton, CFA
Email




 

(207) 541-9647

Wheaton College, BA; University of Chicago Booth School of Business, MBA Chartered Financial AnalystMaine CFA Society, DirectorBoston Security Analysts’ Society




Jessamyn serves as Chief Investment Officer and Senior Vice President at Spinnaker Trust.  She is charged with leading the management of our proprietary investment strategies and directs the portfolio management and investment research teams. 
Prior to joining Spinnaker in early 2011, Jessamyn spent eleven years on the buy-side in Boston following developed international and emerging markets.  She began her career at Wellington Management Company, LLP, and worked as an equity research analyst and portfolio manager after business school at The Boston Company Asset Management, LLC and Fidelity Management & Research, LLC.  Jessamyn earned a B.A. from Wheaton College (MA) and an MBA from The University of Chicago Booth School of Business.  She earned her Chartered Financial Analyst designation in 2004. 
A native of Maine, Jessamyn lives in Falmouth with her husband and two daughters.  







CLOSE
Director of Real Estate 
Christopher O'Neil
Email




 

(207) 541-9652

Boston College, BA
Community Food Pantry for the Town of Freeport, Volunteer
Active Living Community Task Force for Freeport
 




Chris has over 25 years experience in the commercial real estate business as a broker, consultant, asset manager and investor. He was a partner with North Atlantic Commercial Brokers and a broker with Northland Investment Corporation where he specialized in site location, acquisitions and investment sales. He has represented projects or clients such as Portland Square, Crown Life Insurance, SHP Acquisitions, Wishcamper Properties, WEX, MGI Properties, The Cohen Trust/Portland Glass Company and MaineToday Media.
He lives in Freeport with his wife Beth Ahearn and their two children.







CLOSE
Vice President, Senior Client Advisor 
Drew Oestreicher
Email




 

(207) 541-9655

Hamilton College, BA
President of The Victoria Mansion Board of Trustees
Town of Yarmouth Investment Committee
North Yarmouth Academy Advisory Council




Drew has worked with high net worth clients for 20 years helping them achieve their financial goals. He started his career in New York City at Chase and then relocated to his home state of Maine. Most recently Drew was a Principal at Portland Global Advisors.
Drew lives in Yarmouth with his family.







CLOSE
Senior Vice President, Senior Client Advisor 
Cynthia O’Rourke, CFP®
Email




 

(207) 541-9780

College of the Holy Cross, BA
Certified Financial Planner® Certificants of North AmericaFinancial Planning Association
Make-A-Wish Foundation, Board Member
Maine Estate Planning Council
Maine Medical Center Planned Giving Committee
CEEF Endowment Investment Committee
Olympia Snowe Women’s Leadership Institute Corporate Development Committee
 




With over 30 years of experience in the financial services industry, Cindy manages client portfolios and relationships, focusing on all aspects of investment advice and financial planning. Prior to joining Spinnaker Trust (Ram Trust), Cindy was with Charter Oak Capital Management in Portland, and previously with Fidelity Investments for over 16 years. She worked extensively with Fidelity’s highest net worth clients as Vice President and Senior Account Executive in Fidelity’s Private Client Group. She has been a Certified Financial Planner® since 2007.
Cindy lives in Cape Elizabeth with her husband and three children.







CLOSE
Vice President, Senior ESOP Client Advisor 
Jeannine Pendergast, CPA
Email




 

(207) 619-7891

SUNY Geneseo, BS Accounting
The ESOP Association
National Center for Employee Ownership (NCEO)




Jeannine began her career in public accounting performing audits of companies in all industries, including employee benefit plans.  She left public accounting to join Stewart’s Shops Corp, a company that sponsored a large ESOP plan in Saratoga Springs, New York.  She was an internal trustee for the plan for over 10 years.   She managed the administration of the plan, including internal record keeping, repurchase obligation studies, annual stock valuation analysis, education of employees and advising on day to day operational issues.
Jeannine joined the Spinnaker Team in 2015 as the Senior ESOP Client Advisor.  She ensures all Spinnaker’s fiduciary obligations are fulfilled and strives to be a trusted resource for all our ESOP clients.
A native of Rochester, New York, Jeannine lives in Scarborough with her husband and two daughters.  







CLOSE
Account Administrator 
Michele Pezzuti-Morse
Email




 

(207) 541-9790

Smith College, AB; Western Kentucky University, MA; Andover College, Certificate in Paralegal Studies
Professional and Civic Boards and Memberships:Maine Estate Planning Council




Michele came to Spinnaker in 2012 following 10 years at Perkins Thompson in Portland. Initially, Michele worked at Perkins Thompson as the firm’s Asbestos Paralegal and moved to working as the firm’s Trusts and Estates Paralegal where she focused on trust and estate administration. Prior to joining the legal and trust field, Michele worked as both a curator and as an educator.
Michele and her husband live in Portland.







CLOSE
Account Administrator 
Christine C. Powell
Email




 

(207) 541-9654

University of Southern Maine
Boy Scout Troup 83, Treasurer




Chris serves as an Account Administrator at Spinnaker Trust and is charged with the administration of 401(k) retirement plans, employee stock ownership plans and individual retirement accounts and with servicing client relationships. Prior to joining Spinnaker, she worked as an Account Manager at Standard Retirement Services. Chris has over five years of experience in trust operations and administration of 401(k) retirement plans.
A native of Windham, Chris lives there now with her significant other and her son. She enjoys volunteering for the Boy Scouts and School Athletic Boosters.
 







CLOSE
Executive Vice President, Chief Trust Officer, Principal 
Amanda V. Rand, Esq.
Email




 

(207) 541-9643

Duke University, BA; Harvard Law School, JD
Center for Grieving Children, DirectorMaine Estate Planning CouncilMaine Bar Association, Trusts & Estates SectionSpinnaker Trust, Director
			 	



Amanda serves as Executive Vice President and Chief Trust Officer at Spinnaker Trust.  She is charged with developing and servicing client relationships with a particular focus on tax planning and wealth transfer strategies.  As the leader of Spinnaker’s trust administration team, Amanda oversees the management of the firm’s fiduciary activities.
Prior to joining Spinnaker, Amanda worked as a Trusts & Estates lawyer, focusing her practice on complex estate planning and trust and estate administration.  Amanda began her career at Ropes & Gray LLP, in Boston, before returning home to Maine to work at Pierce Atwood LLP and McCandless & Coburn LLC, a boutique estate planning firm.
A native of Falmouth, Amanda lives there with her husband, Mark, and their three children.







CLOSE
Senior Vice President, Chief Operating Officer 
Karen C. Towle
Email




 

(207) 541-9650

			 		University of New England/Westbrook College, BA
			 	



Karen is responsible for finance, human resources and compliance matters for Spinnaker. She has more than 25 years’ experience serving in a similar capacity for Ram Trust Services and its broker-dealer subsidiary, Atlantic Financial Services of Maine. She has served as compliance principal for multiple other investment advisors and broker dealers over the course of her career.
Karen lives in Cape Elizabeth.







CLOSE
Senior Analyst 
Renee A. Walker	
Email




 

(207) 541-9784

			 		University of Maine, BS
			 	



Renee works with the Investment Committee to develop the Strategic Value Portfolio offering for clients. She is also involved with analyzing legacy holdings in client portfolios. Renee has been involved with researching stocks for the portfolio for 14 years, previously for Ram Trust Services. Prior to this, Renee worked as an analyst for Unum’s investment division and at Longwood Partners, a Boston-based hedge fund.
Renee resides in Gorham with her husband and two children.







CLOSE
Office Administrator 
Barbara Wallace
Email




 

(207) 553-7160





Barbara has a varied work history culminating in office management and administration. Prior to her transition from Ram Trust Services to Spinnaker Trust, she began her career in retail management eventually moving into H.R. administration. She then moved into marketing and demo program management and development in the grocery industry. Barbara now enjoys the variety and the challenges of reception and office administration.
Both competitive runners and recreational bicyclists and golfers, Barbara and her husband prefer the great outdoors and enjoy spending time with family, friends, and traveling.







CLOSE
ESOP Client Advisor 
Christopher E. Whitney
Email




 

(207) 541-9793

University of Vermont, BS
Cape Basketball Association-Treasurer




Chris joined the growing ESOP team of Spinnaker Trust in 2016.  As the ESOP Client Advisor, he ensures that all of Spinnaker’s fiduciary obligations are fulfilled.  He works with our existing ESOP clients to educate them and their employees, advise on plan design and monitor third party relationships.   Chris works with other members of the ESOP team to ensure our ESOP clients receive the highest level of service.    Chris is also a member of the ESOP Committee at Spinnaker. 
Prior to joining Spinnaker, Chris worked as a Retirement Planning Consultant for Transamerica servicing clients throughout New England.  Prior to that, he spent 10 years with Actuarial Designs and Solutions based in Scarborough, ME where he was the Vice President in charge of Client Services and Sales & Marketing.  
Chris lives in Cape Elizabeth with his wife, Michelle, and their three children.  







CLOSE
Senior Vice President, Senior Client Advisor 
Kate C. Wilkinson
Email




 

(207) 541-9645

Colby College, BA
Chewonki Foundation, TrusteeMaine Estate Planning Council




Kate joined Spinnaker Trust in 2010 as a Senior Client Advisor. Prior to joining Spinnaker, she was a Senior Portfolio Manager at Ram Trust Services for 12 years. In addition, Kate worked as an Investment Advisor at Key Private Bank, Atlantic Financial Services of Maine, Inc., and Peoples Heritage Bank (now a division of Toronto-Dominion Bank).
Kate resides in Falmouth with her husband, Peter. She enjoys gardening, hiking, sailing, and travel in her spare time.







CLOSE
Project Manager 
Carolyn L.S.  Woronoff
Email




 

(207) 541-9789

University of Maine, BS
State of Maine Notary Public




Carolyn serves as the Project Manager for Spinnaker Trust. Prior to entering the world of finance, Carolyn was a teacher at the secondary level and taught in the field of Social Studies. Since 2003, she has been involved in the start-up of several entities including Lens Governance Advisors, P.A., The Corporate Library, LLC and Ram Investment Advisors, LLC. In this role, she has handled all aspects of state licensing, human resources, disaster restoration planning and regulatory compliance.
Carolyn lives in Portland with her husband and son.







CLOSE
Executive Assistant and Board Liaison 
Nancy J. Wulbrecht
Email




 

(207) 541-9646

Michigan State University, BS; University of California at Irvine, Paralegal Certificate
State of Maine Notary Public




Nancy returned to the workforce in 2005 as Executive Assistant to Spinnaker President Dick Curran. Nancy is also the Assistant to Executive Vice President Bob Gould and Director of Real Estate Chris O’Neil and is the Board Liaison. She has over 20 years of administrative experience. Prior to joining Spinnaker, she spent 10 years as a legal secretary at Sheppard, Mullin, Richter & Hampton LLP in Orange County, California.
Nancy lives in Falmouth with her three teenagers.













				 
			

Board of Directors:

Richard E. Curran Jr., Esq., DirectorSpinnaker Trust
Robert R. Gould, DirectorSpinnaker Trust
Christian L. Barner, Esq., DirectorBergen & Parkinson, LLC
John H. Schiavi, DirectorSchiavi Enterprises
James D. Delamater, DirectorDelamater Financial Consulting Group, LLC.
Amanda V. Rand, Esq., DirectorSpinnaker Trust 
Sara E. Lewis, DirectorSpinnaker Trust
 
 
 



Meet the Crew:

Director of Real Estate
Christopher O'Neil 


View All













							MARKET UPDATE
						

Arrow





							Last
						

							Change
						



	 
	

	 
	

	NASDAQ
	

	6387.7539
	

	-2.2480
	




	 
	

	 
	

	S+P 500
	

	2472.54
	

	-0.91
	






CONNECT:




						123 Free Street, Portland, Maine 04101 • (207) 553-7160 • Privacy Policy



































Spinnaker Trust Holds Position in Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (APD) - Watch List News



















































Home
About
Staff
Privacy Policy
Contact
























Headlines
Business
US News
Health
World
Investing
Technology




















Air Products and Chemicals Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow Watchlist News

 











Latest News



Kite Pharma, Inc. (NASDAQ:KITE) Raised to Strong-Buy at Vetr Inc.					

Raytheon Company (NYSE:RTN) Upgraded to “Buy” at Vetr Inc.					

FireEye, Inc. (FEYE) Stock Rating Upgraded by Vetr Inc.					

Zacks Investment Research Upgrades Immunomedics, Inc. (IMMU) to “Buy”					

Shopify Inc. (SHOP) Lifted to Strong-Buy at Vetr Inc.					

GW Pharmaceuticals PLC (GWPH) Upgraded to Buy by Zacks Investment Research					

Reynolds American Inc (RAI) Given a $60.00 Price Target by Jefferies Group LLC Analysts					

Northland Securities Analysts Give Diamondback Energy, Inc. (NASDAQ:FANG) a $125.00 Price Target					

Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V. (FCAU) Receives Overweight Rating from Morgan Stanley					

Quintiles Transitional Holdings’ (Q) “Overweight” Rating Reiterated at Barclays PLC					

Goldman Sachs BDC, Inc. (GSBD) Rating Lowered to Sell at Zacks Investment Research					

Global Partners LP (GLP) Rating Increased to Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

Thermo Fisher Scientific’s (NYSE:TMO) Overweight Rating Reaffirmed at Barclays PLC					

GTT Communications, Inc. (GTT) Rating Increased to Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

NVIDIA Corporation’s (NVDA) Buy Rating Reaffirmed at Canaccord Genuity					

Rex Energy Corporation (NASDAQ:REXX) PT Set at $4.00 by Northland Securities					

Qiagen N.V.’s (QGEN) Overweight Rating Reiterated at Barclays PLC					

Endeavour Silver Corporation (EXK) Upgraded to Strong-Buy at Zacks Investment Research					

Resolute Energy Corporation (NYSE:REN) Given a $60.00 Price Target by Northland Securities Analysts					

H. Lundbeck A/S- (HLUYY) Rating Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research					



Archives

July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
March 2016
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014




 




						Spinnaker Trust Holds Position in Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (APD)					

						 June 24th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Lindsey Winhoffer 


							Filed Under: Investing - SEC Filing Articles 






Tweet










Spinnaker Trust continued to hold its stake in  Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD) during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund owned 3,070 shares of the basic materials company’s stock at the end of the first quarter. Spinnaker Trust’s holdings in Air Products and Chemicals were worth $415,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
A number of other large investors have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in APD. Compton Capital Management Inc. RI raised its stake in  Air Products and Chemicals by 0.5% in the first quarter. Compton Capital Management Inc. RI now owns 1,700 shares of the basic materials company’s stock valued at $230,000 after buying an additional 8 shares in the last quarter.  Hudock Capital Group LLC raised its stake in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 0.4% in the first quarter. Hudock Capital Group LLC now owns 2,038 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $275,000 after buying an additional 9 shares during the period.  Davis Selected Advisers raised its stake in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 0.6% in the fourth quarter. Davis Selected Advisers now owns 1,836 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $264,000 after buying an additional 11 shares during the period.  Bollard Group LLC raised its stake in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 0.6% in the first quarter. Bollard Group LLC now owns 2,102 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $284,000 after buying an additional 12 shares during the period.  Finally, Bruderman Asset Management LLC raised its stake in shares of  Air Products and Chemicals by 0.4% in the first quarter. Bruderman Asset Management LLC now owns 3,204 shares of the basic materials company’s stock worth $433,000 after buying an additional 12 shares during the period. 89.64% of the stock is owned by institutional investors. 

Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE APD) opened at 144.94 on Friday. Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. has a 12-month low of $122.64 and a 12-month high of $150.45. The company has a 50 day moving average of $144.56 and a 200-day moving average of $142.24. The stock has a market capitalization of $31.56 billion, a price-to-earnings ratio of 10.02 and a beta of 1.25. 




Air Products and Chemicals (NYSE:APD) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The basic materials company reported $1.43 EPS for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $1.38 by $0.05. Air Products and Chemicals had a return on equity of 19.26% and a net margin of 36.19%. The firm had revenue of $1.98 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $1.84 billion. During the same period in the previous year, the business earned $1.82 earnings per share. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up 11.4% on a year-over-year basis.  On average, equities research analysts forecast that  Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. will post $6.15 earnings per share for the current year. 
The company also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Monday, August 14th. Investors of record on Monday, July 3rd will be given a dividend of $0.95 per share. This represents a $3.80 annualized dividend and a dividend yield of 2.62%. The ex-dividend date is Thursday, June 29th. Air Products and Chemicals’s payout ratio is 26.28%. 
WARNING: This article was first  posted by Watch List News and is the property of of Watch List News. If you are viewing this article on another website, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of U.S. & international copyright and trademark laws. The correct version of this article can be accessed at https://www.watchlistnews.com/spinnaker-trust-holds-position-in-air-products-and-chemicals-inc-apd/1389824.html. 
A number of brokerages have issued reports on APD. BidaskClub lowered shares of Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report on Friday. Jefferies Group LLC  reaffirmed a “hold” rating and set a $155.00 price objective on shares of Air Products and Chemicals in a report on Tuesday, May 2nd. Zacks Investment Research raised shares of Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $152.00 price objective for the company in a report on Tuesday, April 18th. Finally, Deutsche Bank AG raised shares of Air Products and Chemicals from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and increased their price objective for the company from $148.00 to $160.00 in a report on Monday, May 1st. Two equities research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, five have assigned  a hold rating and eight have assigned  a buy rating to the company. The stock currently has an average rating of “Hold” and a consensus target price of $153.71.
About Air Products and Chemicals
Air Products and Chemicals, Inc is an industrial gases company. The Company’s Industrial Gases business provides atmospheric and process gases and related equipment to manufacturing markets, including refining and petrochemical, metals, electronics, and food and beverage. The Company operates through seven segments: Industrial Gases-Americas, Industrial Gases-Europe, Middle East, and Africa (EMEA), Industrial Gases-Asia, Industrial Gases-Global, Materials Technologies, Energy-from-Waste, and Corporate and other.

Want to see what other hedge funds are holding APD? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for Air Products and Chemicals, Inc. (NYSE:APD).

Receive News & Ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Air Products and Chemicals Inc. and related companies with Analyst Ratings Network's FREE daily email newsletter.



 










Lindsey Winhoffer 























 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Sirius XM Making Big Investment In Pandora





Tax Reform Not Going Quite As Planned





Western Digital Files Lawsuit To Halt Toshiba Chip Business Sale





Sinclair Broadcast Group Announces Deal For Tribune Media





Starbucks Has A Hit With Its Unicorn Frappuccino











			© Watch List News, LLC 2008-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Staff 
			| Contact 



















































Spinnaker Trust's Reviews, Salaries, Interviews & Resumes | LiveCareer


























 


  Menu  Close 
  LiveCareer  



 For Employers
 Contact Us
 Live Chat
 Log In
 Log In



Resume Builder 
 Resumes




Resume Examples
Resume Templates
Resume Samples
Resume Tips
Resume Services





JOB INDUSTRIES



Accounting & Finance
Admin
Business
Customer Service
Education




Engineering
Finance
Human Resources
IT
Law




Management
Media & Entertainment
Medical
Sales
Science




Retail
Marketing
Construction
Real Estate
Automotive




Production
Social Services
Transportation




 View All Job Industries  





JOB INDUSTRIES



Accounting & Finance
Business Templates
Classic Template
Computers Technology
Contemporary




Culinary Templates
Engineering Templates
Entry Level
Experienced
Management




Media Entertainment
Space Saver
Standard Template
Traditional
Traditional Template




IT
Customer Service
Sales
Education
Marketing




Retail
Medical
Finance
Microsoft Word
HR




 View All Job Industries  





JOB INDUSTRIES



Accountant
Analyst
Architect
Art
Bartender




Bookkeeper
Chef
Computer Science
Consultant
Engineering




Entry Level
Executive
Housekeeper
IT (Information Technology)
Manager




Military
Nursing
Receptionist
Resume Objectives
Retail




Sales
Server
Teacher
Technical
Resume Samples Guide




 View All Job Industries  





Featured Resume Tips





How to Include Keywords In Your Resume
Without strategically placing keywords in your resume, employers won't be able to find you.







Your Top 6 Resume Questions
See our customer's questions about how to write an effective, job-winning resume


Read More Resume Tips  

Resume Tips

How to Write Your First Resume
Best Resume Formats
Including References on Resume
Do's and Don'ts for Your Education Section
How to Write Your Resume Work Experience Section

View Other Resume Tips  



More Tips



  

Professional Resume Writing
Let us write it for you! Put the power of a professional resume writer on your side and get the job faster.



  

Resume Check
Make sure your resume is 100% error free! Instant feedback + make your resume recruiter ready.





  

Have a Pro Review Your Resume
Get an expert 2nd opinion with Resume Review. Professional advice will help you make your resume perfect so get you hired faster.



  

Professional Cover Letter Writing
Make the ultimate first impression with employers. Stand out from the crowd with a professionally written cover letter to match your resume.





 View Other Resume Services  







 Cover Letters




Cover Letter Builder
Cover Letter Examples
Letter Samples





COVER LETTER BUILER

  

Get your foot in the door with a stand-out cover letter
Your cover letter is your first change to impress potential employers. Cover Letter Builder gives you the tools to get noticed!
Create a Cover Letter  



COVER LETTER TIPS

  

Your Top 6 Resume Questions
See our customer's questions about how to write an effective, job-winning resume
Read Tips  





Cover Letter Job Industries



Education
Accounting & Finance
Customer Service
Management
Administrative




Marketing
Sales
Business
Medical
Healthcare




Media & Entertainment
IT (Information & Technology)




 See All Categories  





Letter Sample Categories



Cover Letters
Resignation Letters
Application Letters
Permission Letters
Termination Letters




Leave Letters
Appreciation Letters
Recommendation Letters
Thank You Letters
Appointment Letters




Reference Letters
Apology Letters




 See All Categories  







 Interviews




Interview Game Plan
Interview Videos
Interview Tips
Interview Questions





Interview Game Plan

  

Plan for Interview Success
Our proven solution is backed by a decade of research and has helped thousands get a job!
Learn more  



Free Video

  

3 Techniques To Answer Any Interview Question
Watch how you can answer any interview question and win the job!
Watch free video now 







Interview Videos

  

What's your greatest strength?
Interviewers will ask similar questions and gauge your response



  

How do you stay organized?
Hiring Managers want to learn how you get things done


View All Interview Videos  



Interview Categories

Common Questions
Good & Bad Answers
Good Answers Only
Bad Answers Only



Industries

Admin Support
Healthcare
Restaurant
Retail



View More Interview Preparations 







Job Interview Tips

  

Your First Ever Job Interview
10 tips that will help you have a successful first ever job interview.



  

What is your Biggest Failure?
Read how to properly interpret and answer this seemingly tricky question.





 View All Interview Tips  








Featured Interview Questions:

  

Why Are You The Best Candidate For This Position?
You want to make sure that you provide a clear and intelligible answer.



  

What Are Your Career Goals?
Make sure your goals line up with what you would be doing in their company.





 See All Interview Questions  







 Jobs




Search Jobs
Job Tips







Job Search Top Cities



Austin
Chicago
Dallas
Houston
Jacksonville
Los Angeles




New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose





Job Search Top Industries



Accounting And Finance
Administrative Support
Business
Computers And Technology
Construction
Customer Service




Education And Training
Engineering
Food And Beverage
Healthcare
Human Resources
Sales





Job Search Top Companies



Amazon
Coca Cola Company
Costco
Fedex
Frito Lay
Google




Postmates
Procter and Gamble
Starbucks
Uber
Walgreens
Walmart






 View All Jobs  





Job Tips



  

Career Tips
You only get out of your career what you put into it.



  

Civic and Volunteer Activities Can Help You Get a Job
It makes you more well-rounded and enhances your appearance through your resume





  

Soft Skills in Demand
You may have skills that are high in demand and not even know it.





 Read All Job Tips  







 Companies




Companies









Amazon
Apple
Chevron Corp
Citibank
Coca Cola




Comcast
Costco
Deloitte
Fedex
General Electric




Google
Hewlett Packard
Hot Topic
Ikea
Kaiser Permanente




Sears
Mcafee
Nike
Nordstrom Rack
Planned Parenthood




Macy's
Starbucks
Uber
Walgreens
Walmart




 View All Companies  







 Resources




Resume Directory
Quintessential
Job Descriptions





Top Industries



Architecture
Community and Public Service
Education and Training
Government
Green Jobs
Healthcare




Human Resources
Management
Performing Arts
Science
Skilled Trades
Textile and Apparel




 View All Industries  






Quintessential by livecareer

  

What's your greatest strength?
Your one-stop source for the latest career tools, job search tips, and expert advice.
Read more 



I Am A Student

College Search
College Majors
College Planning
Internships

All Student Resources  

I Am A Career Changer

Career Assessment Tools
Articles
Find Your Career Passion
Quizzes

All Career Change Resources  

I Am A Job Seeker

Career Exploration
Checklist
Career Planning
Blog

All Job Seeker Resources  



Top Job Descriptions



Cashier Job Description
Project Manager Job Description
Accountant Job Description
Administrative Assistant Job Description
Operations Manager Job Description
Account Manager Job Description




Receptionist Job Description
Office Manager Job Description
Business Analyst Job Description
Marketing Manager Job Description
 Executive Assistant Job Description
Sales Associate Job Description




Sales Manager Job Description
Customer Service Job Description
 Sales Representative Job Description
Graphic Designer Job Description
Product Manager Job Description
General Manager Job Description




Data Analyst Job Description
Bookkeeper Job Description




 View All Job Descriptions  






















 LiveCareer 
 Company 
Spinnaker Trust 

















Search


















Spinnaker Trust














Overview



 Reviews
                                



 Interviews
                                



 Compensation
                                



 Benefits
                                


Is This your Company?














Spinnaker Trust Overview



Website:

N/A

Locations:


                                                             Portland, ME 

                                                
& 1 other city



Employees:
10




Founded:
N/A
President:
Richard Curran
Industry:

Investment Advice
& 1 other industry



Revenue:
$3,451,210





                                            Spinnaker Trust is an investment advice company found directly at Portland, ME. It boasts an annual revenue of $3.5 million and employs ten people. A uniquely appealing company, Spinnaker Trust has become quite noticeable in the market. The current President of the company is Richard Curran.
                                        









What’s your overall rating for Spinnaker Trust?
Skip question 









All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous



Thank you! Please, type the name of that employer.




Got it! 

Now tell us more about your employer

All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous

You have already provided some feedback on this company! 



Are you a current or former employee?
Skip question 



 Current
                

 Former
                
All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous




Would you recommend Spinnaker Trust to a friend?
Skip question 



 Yes
                

 No
                
All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous




How difficult was the interview at Spinnaker Trust?
Skip question 


Easy
Hard

5.0
 4.0
 3.0 
2.0 
1.0 

Hard
All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous




Did you get an offer?
Skip question 



 Yes
                

 No
                
All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous




What's your base salary?
Skip question 



$0-$29,999
$30,000-$37,999
$38,000-$49,999
$50,000-$67,999
$68,000+

All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous




How do you rate the benefits at Spinnaker Trust?
Skip question 











All reviews and ratings are completely anonymous



GO TO FULL REVIEW



GO TO FULL REVIEW
Go to Company Overview




Your review is looking great!
Want to share more of your experience?

General Review

The Interview Process

Your Compensation

your Benefits


GO TO FULL REVIEW




Thanks for providing information about your experience with Spinnaker Trust








Add a New Company

Please fill out the information below about the company



Company Name



Company's Website



Business Address



Business Address (Optional)





State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming






City





Zip







                                        You agree to the Terms of Service and the Privacy Policy.
                                    




SUBMIT
Cancel









 



Build your resume today for FREE
Build your resume today










Spinnaker Trust Employee Statistics




School/University


Top Degrees


Also Worked at


Time at Spinnaker Trust

























                                                The largest number of Spinnaker Trust employees graduated from Plymouth State University.
                                            

                                                Educational trends among employees at Spinnaker Trust provide insight into the company's intellectual environment.  The most common degree held by employees (100%) would be a Bachelor of Science.
                                            

                                                Ram Trust Company and Citigroup Global Banking are also popular companies for job seekers applying to Spinnaker Trust.
                                            



























Spinnaker Trust Top Locations











Popular Job Titles at Spinnaker Trust














Build your resume for FREE and get the job you've always wanted.
Build your resume today









Upload your logo.












Drop image here or click to  browse
(Acceptable file types include JPEG, PNG and Size should be less than 50KB)



File size 
Type 
Image dimension 



Uploading…
Error! . Try again!























Sign in to your Account


Email Address



Password



Log In


Stay signed in
                                        




Log In
Log In





Forgot password?

                                Don’t have an account? Sign up













Create a LiveCareer account


First Name



Last Name



Email Address



Password



Sign up





Already have an account?















Resume Tools

Resume Builder
Resume Tips
CV Templates
Resume Directory
Resume Samples





Cover Letter 

Cover Letter Builder
Cover Letter Tips
Cover Letter Samples





Mighty Recruiter 

Job Sourcing
Free Job Posting



Company 

Job Listings
Company Directory





Resources 

Quintessential LiveCareer
Education Opportunities





About 

Who We Are
Work Here
Affiliates
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use





Help & Support 

Customer Service/Billing
Contact Us
Frequently Asked Questions









 Language 





English
English (UK)






Español
Français






Italiano
Deutsch






Nederlands
Português
Polski







Customer Service 
 
customerservice@livecareer.com800-652-8430 Mon- Fri 8am - 8pm CST Sat 8am - 5pm CST, Sun 10am - 6pm CST
				  

Stay in touch with us













© 2017, Bold Limited. All rights reserved.


Powered by  













	SPINNAKER TRUST Trademark of Spinnaker Trust. Serial Number: 76293783 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Insurance & Financial Services
SPINNAKER TRUST










 
Get FREE email alerts













SPINNAKER TRUST  Trademark Information
 Spinnaker Trust
Consultation, advice, management and trust services in the fields of personal trusts and retirement plans




Perfect for these industries

Insurance & Financial Services





Words that describe this mark
consultation      advice      management   trust   services   fields   personal   trusts   retirement   plans    
                                    




This is a brand page for the SPINNAKER TRUST trademark by Spinnaker Trust 
                                in Portland, , 04112.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this SPINNAKER TRUST trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Spinnaker Trust of the SPINNAKER TRUST trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the SPINNAKER TRUST trademark.
                           






On Friday, August 03, 2001,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        SPINNAKER TRUST by 
                        Spinnaker Trust, Portland 04112.
                        The USPTO has given the SPINNAKER TRUST 
                        trademark serial  number of  76293783.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is ABANDONED - FAILURE TO RESPOND OR LATE RESPONSE.
                        The correspondent listed for SPINNAKER TRUST is 
                        
                        
                                            JAMES F. KEENAN of 
                                            BERNSTEIN, SHUR, SAWYER & NELSON,  100 MIDDLE ST., P.O. BOX 9729, PORTLAND, MAINE 04104-5029 
                                .
                            The SPINNAKER TRUST trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Insurance & Financial Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for SPINNAKER TRUST 
                            is Consultation, advice, management and trust services in the fields of personal trusts and retirement plans. 
                            





Word mark:
 SPINNAKER TRUST


  Status/Status Date:  


ABANDONED - FAILURE TO RESPOND OR LATE RESPONSE

5/31/2002






  Serial Number:  
76293783


  Filing Date:  
8/3/2001


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
Consultation, advice, management and trust services in the fields of personal trusts and retirement plans


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
N/A


Last Applicant/Owner:

Spinnaker TrustPortland 04112
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Drawing/Design + Words


 Design Search: 
See Similar Logos >>



                                                    Semi  -  circles  (Geometric figures and solids   -  Coding and searching guide) see more design...




Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


JAMES F. KEENAN
BERNSTEIN, SHUR, SAWYER & NELSON
100 MIDDLE ST., P.O. BOX 9729
PORTLAND, MAINE 04104-5029






 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (036) - Insurance; financial affairs; monetary affairs; real estate affairs. 


First Use Anywhere: 
5/25/2001


First Use In Commerce: 
5/25/2001





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your SPINNAKER TRUST trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

5/31/2002
ABANDONED - FAILURE TO RESPOND OR LATE RESPONSE


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



JAMES F. KEENAN


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of SPINNAKER TRUST trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search spinnakertrust on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for SPINNAKER TRUST 




SPINNAKER TRUST is providing Consultation, advice, management and trust services in the fields of personal trusts and retirement plans.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 






















Spinnaker Trust in Rockland, ME 04841 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Maine
» Rockland
» Specialized Insurance
» Spinnaker Trust













Spinnaker Trust


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





76 Acadia Dr  Rockland, Maine 04841


(207) 563-5994


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Spinnaker Trust is located at the address 76 Acadia Dr in Rockland, Maine 04841.  They can be contacted via phone at (207) 563-5994 for pricing, hours and directions.  Spinnaker Trust has an annual sales volume of 501K - 999,999.  .Spinnaker Trust provides Commercial Services, Estimates, Consultations to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Spinnaker Trust view the map to the right.  For reviews of Spinnaker Trust see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Family Policies
, Industrial Policies
, Business Continuation Plans
, IRAs
, Tax Free Investments
, Self-Employed Policies
, Profit Sharing Plans
, Mortgage Investments
, Agency Bonds
, Combination Policies



SERVICES


Estimates
, Retirement Planning
, Consultations
, Charitable Giving
, Investment Services
, Individual Services
, Rollovers
, Income Planning
, Disability Income
, Commercial Services



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (207) 563-5994
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 10 To 19
Exact Employee Count: 10
Exact Sales Volume: 510000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 501K - 999,999
CATEGORIES:


Specialized Insurance
Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Finance
Insurance
Investments & Securities
Specialized Insurance & Warranties



Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM












Spinnaker Trust                                                                                                          - Portland                                          , ME         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



ME



Portland



Investment offices, Nec



Unit Investment Trusts



                            Spinnaker Trust
                                    



 





















S 


Spinnaker Trust                                                                                                         
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



123 FREE ST PORTLAND, ME 04101
Get Directions



(207) 553-7160
www.spinnakertrust.com                                                                                  





Business Info



 Founded 2001
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $6,381,989.00
 Employee Count 30
 Industries Unit Investment Trusts
 Contacts Richard E Curran Jr                                                                                                     







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2001 the company has been providing Unit Investment Trusts. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







S

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


















Spinnaker Trust in Portland, ME 04101 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Maine
» Portland
» Portfolio Management & Investment Services
» Spinnaker Trust













Spinnaker Trust


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





5 Milk St Ste 5 Portland, Maine 04101


(207) 553-7160
Website


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Spinnaker Trust is located at the address 5 Milk St in Portland, Maine 04101.  They can be contacted via phone at (207) 553-7160 for pricing, hours and directions.  Spinnaker Trust has an annual sales volume of 1M – 1,999,999.  .For more information contact David  Carter, Marketing Director or  go to www.spinnakertrust.comSpinnaker Trust provides Cash Management, Institutional Services, College Funding to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Spinnaker Trust view the map to the right.  For reviews of Spinnaker Trust see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Employer-Sponsored Pensions
, Loans
, Rollover Plans
, Bonds
, Combination Policies
, Short-Term Policies
, Treasury Bonds
, Securities
, Group Policies
, Family Policies



SERVICES


College Funding
, Cash Management
, Financial Management
, Family Wealth Planning
, Wealth Management
, Rollovers
, Estimates
, Investments
, Institutional Services
, Income Planning



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (207) 553-7160
Website: www.spinnakertrust.com
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Main Contact First Name: Richard
Main Contact Last Name: Curran
Main Contact Title: President
Employee Size: 10 To 19
Exact Employee Count: 15
Exact Sales Volume: 750000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 1M – 1,999,999
CATEGORIES:


Portfolio Management & Investment Services
Finance
Investments & Securities



People Also Viewed


Charter Trust


415 Congreme st Ste 500  Portland, Maine 04101




Van Ness Investments


13 Swan St  Portland, Maine 04102




Pfpg Portland Financial Grp


477 Congress St Ste 814 Portland, Maine 04101




Banknorth Group, Inc


2 Portland Sq  Portland, Maine 04101




Atlantic National Trust LLC


50 Portland Pier Ste 400  Portland, Maine 04101




Estes Investments LLC


10 Dana St 300A Ste Portland, Maine 04101





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




David  Carter
MARKETING DIRECTOR
Phone: (207) 553-7160 
 



Sara  Lewis
PORTFOLIO MANAGER
Phone: (207) 553-7160 
 



Richard  Curran
PRESIDENT
Phone: (207) 553-7160 
 



 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM












SPINNAKER TRUST - BRISTOL, RI - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



RI



BRISTOL



Trusts, Nec



Trusts, Nec



                            SPINNAKER TRUST
                                    



 





















S 


SPINNAKER TRUST
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



 BRISTOL, RI 02809
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2006
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $140,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Trusts, Nec
 Contacts 







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message










VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







S

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.



















Fintech firm Innovest teams up with Spinnaker for first foray into Maine | Mainebiz.biz

































advertisement















register | log in | mobile















News
NEWS01







Today's Headlines
How To's
Opinion
Polls
Lists














Event Calendar
Post an Event























Print
Email
Order a PDF




June 15, 2017
    


Fintech firm Innovest teams up with Spinnaker for first foray into Maine









Photo / Renee Cordes
Spinnaker Trust, a Maine-chartered, non-depository trust company based in Portland, is implementing a new fintech platform provided by Innovest Systems LLC, a New York-based company in the growing financial technology field.







by Renee Cordes

Innovest Systems LLC, a fast-growing New York-based company in the burgeoning financial technology, or fintech field, is rolling out a new technology platform for Spinnaker Trust as it hunts for other partners in New England."We are absolutely interested and are talking to several other prospects," Maryanne Campbell, Innovest's senior vice president for sales and marketing, told Mainebiz."I can't divulge their names, but we are definitely looking at the Maine market and really the entire Northeast, especially expanding from Boston and above," she added.Innovest CEO Glenn Schmidt said Spinnaker Trust will be Innovest's first client in Maine, though the company's application "really isn't geographically oriented."The new platform is due to go live on July 1.Spinnaker Trust opted for Innovest's flagship InnoTrust product after looking at a "very broad spectrum" of options, including outsourcing, according to Ainsley Coll, Spinnaker's director of operations."A lot of firms our size are moving towards outsourcing in one shape or another," she said, "but we feel that having our operations in-house helps to enhance our client experience."Besides being more user-friendly and aesthetically appealing than the current portal, the new, cloud-based portal will allow Spinnaker's clients to aggregate their own data, access multiple accounts through mobile applications, and access tax forms and other documents, which they are not able to currently, she said.Open architecture
Coll cited InnoTrust's open architecture as a major plus, allowing for a full integration with Spinnaker's existing system for customer relationship management."We also wanted to partner with a firm that was willing to collaborate with us and was pro-active about regulation changes and clients' changes," Coll said, "also a company that was interested in creating that great experience for our clients. It's really a lot about innovation, collaboration, flexibility."Innovest's Schmidt explained that "in the trust banking space, it's not just the type of technology, but it's the openness of our platform … that allows us to partner with people like Spinnaker and give them full access to their own data."Before the big day in a couple of weeks, various tests and trainings are taking place as Spinnaker gives clients a heads up on what to expect. "We've also taken the opportunity to take a step back and look at how we do things now and what we can do better," said Coll. "We're in the trenches right now."Spinnaker Trust, a Maine-chartered, non-depository trust company, manages over $1.2 billion for more than 300 clients.Innovest, a portfolio company of Westport, Conn.-based private equity firm Bluff Point Management, has more than $425 billion in assets in its systems and processes more than 4 million client transactions a month.For two years in a row Innovest has been named to Deloitte's Technology 500 list of the fastest-growing technology, media, telecommunications, life sciences and energy tech companies in North America. It ranked No. 259 in 2016, and No. 375 in 2015.














Print
Email
Order a PDF



RELATED CONTENT

Kennebec Savings Bank opens Freeport location
Maine Water Co. one of 12 qualifying for EPA low-cost loans
Bangor Savings to refurbish former Bank of America site in Biddeford
BerryDunn merges with Compass to boost health care practice
Vets First Choice raises $223M to fuel expansion
Greenlight Maine names 26 semifinalists for third season




BACK TO TOP | POST A COMMENT




			Comments
		


Type your comment here:





























Sign up now to get statewide business news each day with the Daily Report
 
Today's Daily Report
Portland cold-storage plan inches ahead
Breen's equal pay bill dies after Senate upholds veto
Maine lawmakers back roads bond; two other proposals stall
CMMC receives American Heart Association Award for quality stroke care
Kennebec Savings Bank opens Freeport location






Today's Poll
Do you think lawmakers and the governor should not change, or ignore, what voters have approved in a statewide referendum?<>





ADVERTISEMENTS











Most read
Most emailed




Greenlight Maine names 26 semifinalists for third season
Lincolnville winery wins three 'double gold' medals in international competition
Homing in on York County: As existing homes fly off the shelf, new construction booms
Two Maine defense projects clear key hurdle in U.S. Senate
Maine Food Insider: New England's lone liquor barrel maker adds flavor to whiskey and beer





Lincolnville winery wins three 'double gold' medals in international competition
Maine Food Insider: Thousands of 'grainiacs' expected to flock to Skowhegan
Gelato Fiasco featured in O, The Oprah Magazine
Security company's growth warrants two moves in under a year in downtown Kennebunk
Portland Co.'s $12M marina expansion gets initial OK






Twitter
Facebook


Tweets about "@Mainebiz"



Most Popular on Facebook
























browse by






REGION
Central
Down East
Midcoast
Northern
Southern
Western


City
Augusta
Bangor
Lewiston/Auburn
Portland







INDUSTRY
Agriculture
Architecture & Design
Banking & Finance
Biotechnology
Communications
Real Estate & 
                        Construction
Creative economy
Economic Development
Education and Training
Energy & Utilities
Fisheries & Marine
Forest Products






 
Health Care
Human resources
Insurance
Legal
Manufacturing
Marketing & Media
Nonprofits
Retail & Food service
Small Business
Technology
Tourism & Recreation
Transportation
Trade














ABOUT US
Mission
Contact us
New England Business Media
Careers
Refund and privacy policy


Advertising
Ad tech specs
Ad planning calendar
Audience data
Contacts
Request info







EVENTS
Momentum Convention
Business leader  of the year
Women to watch
The Next List
On the Road with Mainebiz


Data center
Download our top lists


Other New England Business Media sites
Hartfordbusiness.com
Wbjournal.com
Custom Publishing






FOLLOW US
RSS feeds
Facebook
LinkedIn
Twitter


Supplements & Directories
Book of Lists
Fact Book
The Giving Guide
Making It In Maine












    Copyright 2017 New England Business Media
    





















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














spinnaker trust - NetFind Content Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web




























Web


Web



Content











Estate Planning Attorney - We Help Protect Your Assets



Ad
 ·
www.davidcarrierlaw.com/​EstatePlanning/​LawFirm



Expert In Asset Protection. Attend Our Free Life Plan Workshops. Call Today!




Spinnaker Trust - Spinnaker Trust. | ask.com



Ad
 ·
www.ask.com/​Spinnaker Trust



Search Spinnaker Trust.





Ask a Question



Explore Q&A




Questions and Answers



Ask.com – What’s your Question?





Spinnaker Trust - Spinnaker Trust. | finecomb.com



Ad
 ·
www.finecomb.com/​Spinnaker Trust



Find answers quickly from across the web with Finecomb.com.




Trusts - Find the Top Results Here | search.com



Ad
 ·
www.search.com/​Trusts/​Fast



If You Want Trusts Find Them Here & Save Time and Money!





All That You Need



Straight Accounting



Your Finances Up To Date



Difficult Finances
















Nore Folly




building. The National Trust, which restored the folly in 1993, states that Nore Folly was "built in 1814 for the Countess of Newburgh’s picnic parties".Eartham to Puck Lane and Nore Hill

more


Go to:
Encyclopedia
-
News
-
Videos
-
Reference


Source:
Wikipedia







Results From The WOW.Com Content Network

Duchess Kate glows in cream MaxMara coat, shows her ...

https://www.aol.com/article/lifestyle/2015/02/12/kate-middleton...


Duchess Kate glows in cream MaxMara coat, shows her blossoming baby bump. Share. ... this close up photo while at the Spinnaker ... with the 1851 Trust.


Spinnaker Tower - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Spinnaker_Tower


The Spinnaker Tower is a 560-foot (170 m) landmark observation tower in Portsmouth, England, UK. It is the centrepiece of the redevelopment of Portsmouth Harbour ...


Did Audrina Patridge just get her pregnancy announcement ...

https://www.aol.com/article/2015/12/18/did-audrina-patridge-just...


Did Audrina Patridge just get her pregnancy announcement sponsored for money ... get her pregnancy announcement sponsored for ... at the Spinnaker ...


It's official: The Duchess of Cambridge is in labor - AOL ...

https://www.aol.com/article/lifestyle/2015/05/02/its-official-the...


Kate smiles as she paints a mural as part of a community art project for the 1851 Trust. ... at the Spinnaker ... official: The Duchess of Cambridge, ...


Prince William is working with the spitting image of his ...

https://www.aol.com/article/2015/07/14/prince-william-is-working...


Prince William is working with the spitting image of ... Prince William is working with the spitting image ... community art project for the 1851 Trust.


Computer Speakers - engadget.com

https://www.engadget.com/reviews/computer-speakers


Engadget is the original home for technology news and reviews. Since its founding in 2004, we've grown from an exhaustive source for consumer tech news to a global ...


Genoa (sail) - WOW.com

content.wow.com/wiki/Genoa_(sail)


Genoa (sail) Source: ... it is a hybrid between a genoa and an asymmetrical spinnaker. ... many Republicans seem to trust... Jun 09, 2017 Christina Gregg.


Royal family releases new photos of Princess Charlotte ...

https://www.aol.com/article/2015/11/29/buckingham-palace-releases...


Royal family releases new photos of Princess Charlotte. ... Royal family releases new photos of Princess ... a community art project for the 1851 Trust.


AOL.com - Welcome to AOL

https://mail.aol.com/38236-111/aol-6/en-us/Suite.aspx


Get a free email address from AOL now! You no longer need to be an AOL member to take advantage of great AOL Mail features such as industry-leading spam and virus ...


Sausalito, California - WOW.com

www.wow.com/wiki/Sausalito


Sausalito is a San Francisco ... underwater streets because the streets are public trust lands intended ... are seen entering the Spinnaker restaurant with ...










Estate Planning Attorney - We Help Protect Your Assets



Ad
 ·
www.davidcarrierlaw.com/​EstatePlanning/​LawFirm



Expert In Asset Protection. Attend Our Free Life Plan Workshops. Call Today!




Spinnaker Trust - Spinnaker Trust. | ask.com



Ad
 ·
www.ask.com/​Spinnaker Trust



Search Spinnaker Trust.





Ask a Question



Explore Q&A




Questions and Answers



Ask.com – What’s your Question?





Spinnaker Trust - Spinnaker Trust. | finecomb.com



Ad
 ·
www.finecomb.com/​Spinnaker Trust



Find answers quickly from across the web with Finecomb.com.




Trusts - Find the Top Results Here | search.com



Ad
 ·
www.search.com/​Trusts/​Fast



If You Want Trusts Find Them Here & Save Time and Money!





All That You Need



Straight Accounting



Your Finances Up To Date



Difficult Finances




Searches related tospinnaker trust



spinnaker investments llc


spinnaker trust portland me


spinnaker trust maine


bob gould spinnaker trust



portland trust company maine


listen trust portland me


spinnaker intranet employee portal




12345Next

Related Searches



spinnaker investments llc


spinnaker trust portland me


spinnaker trust maine


bob gould spinnaker trust


portland trust company maine


listen trust portland me


spinnaker intranet employee portal




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network








